Ohio, session 136, HB732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 122.074 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 122.074. (A) The "Ohio, The Heart of It All" pass program is created, to be administered and developed by TourismOhio. The purpose of the program is to promote to the public the state's artistic, cultural, historical, educational, recreational, film, and museum attractions. Beginning in 2027, the pass shall be available, for a price determined by TourismOhio, to any person who applies for it in a form and manner established by TourismOhio, and to residents of the state at a discounted rate. Revenue from the pass shall be deposited into the Ohio, The Heart of It All pass fund created under division (D) of this section. (B)(1) Any person or organization that is located in the state, and that contributes to a healthy tourism economy, may apply to TourismOhio, on a form and in a manner established by TourismOhio, to become a TourismOhio partner and participate in the program. The applicant, on its application, shall indicate what discounts, special experiences, promotional gifts, or other benefits it may offer to pass holders. If the applicant is selected as a TourismOhio partner, it shall offer to pass holders the discounts, special experiences, promotional gifts, or other benefits as indicated in its application. The director of development may enter into a cooperative or contractual agreement with a TourismOhio partner as described in division (A)(3) of section 122.073 of the Revised Code. (2) TourismOhio may monitor a TourismOhio partner's compliance with the program and any agreements entered into between the director of development and the partner, including through reporting requirements. A TourismOhio partner is subject to audit by TourismOhio or the department of development. (3) If TourismOhio or the director of development determines that a TourismOhio partner is not complying with this section or any agreements made under this section, TourismOhio or the director of development may, at TourismOhio's or the director's discretion, cancel the agreement, and may rescind the person's or organization's status as a TourismOhio partner. (C) TourismOhio shall produce promotional materials for the pass and shall promote TourismOhio partners' attractions in the promotional materials described in division (B) of this section. (D) The Ohio, The Heart of It All pass fund is created in the state treasury. It shall consist of transfers of money authorized by the general assembly and revenues received by TourismOhio under division (A) of this section, as well as gifts, grants, devises, bequests, and other financial contributions made to the fund for the purpose of promoting tourism in the state. Investment earnings on money in the fund shall be credited to the general revenue fund. Money in the fund may be used by TourismOhio in performing its duties under this section and to pay personnel and other administrative expenses. (E) TourismOhio may adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section. Section 2. In honor of the two hundred fiftieth anniversary of the founding of the United States, the "Ohio, The Heart of It All" pass created under section 122.074 of the Revised Code shall be available for free to any Ohio resident that applies for it, on a form and in a manner as established by TourismOhio. The pass shall be available on a date to be determined by TourismOhio and shall be valid until 2027.